waterfox/browser/locales/lt/extensions/spellcheck/hunspell/lt.aff
SFX T ti      imojo           [sš]ti
SFX T ti      imajam          [sš]ti
SFX T ti      imąjį           [sš]ti
SFX T ti      imuoju          [sš]ti
SFX T ti      imajame         [sš]ti
SFX T zti     simasis         zti
SFX T zti     simojo          zti
SFX T zti     simajam         zti
SFX T zti     simąjį          zti
SFX T zti     simuoju         zti
SFX T zti     simajame        zti
SFX T žti     šimasis         žti
SFX T žti     šimojo          žti
SFX T žti     šimajam         žti
SFX T žti     šimąjį          žti
SFX T žti     šimuoju         žti
SFX T žti     šimajame        žti
SFX T ti      simoji          [^sšzž]ti
SFX T ti      simosios        [^sšzž]ti
SFX T ti      simajai         [^sšzž]ti
SFX T ti      simąją          [^sšzž]ti
SFX T ti      simąja          [^sšzž]ti
SFX T ti      simojoje        [^sšzž]ti
SFX T ti      simojoj         [^sšzž]ti
SFX T ti      imoji           [sš]ti
SFX T ti      imosios         [sš]ti
SFX T ti      imajai          [sš]ti
SFX T ti      imąją           [sš]ti
SFX T ti      imąja           [sš]ti
SFX T ti      imojoje         [sš]ti
SFX T ti      imojoj          [sš]ti
SFX T zti     simoji          zti
SFX T zti     simosios        zti
SFX T zti     simajai         zti
SFX T zti     simąją          zti
SFX T zti     simąja          zti
SFX T zti     simojoje        zti
SFX T zti     simojoj         zti
SFX T žti     šimoji          žti
SFX T žti     šimosios        žti
SFX T žti     šimajai         žti
SFX T žti     šimąją          žti
SFX T žti     šimąja          žti
SFX T žti     šimojoje        žti
SFX T žti     šimojoj         žti
SFX T ti      simieji         [^sšzž]ti
SFX T ti      simųjų          [^sšzž]ti
SFX T ti      simiesiems      [^sšzž]ti
SFX T ti      simuosius       [^sšzž]ti
SFX T ti      simaisiais      [^sšzž]ti
SFX T ti      simuosiuose     [^sšzž]ti
SFX T ti      imieji          [sš]ti
SFX T ti      imųjų           [sš]ti
SFX T ti      imiesiems       [sš]ti
SFX T ti      imuosius        [sš]ti
SFX T ti      imaisiais       [sš]ti
SFX T ti      imuosiuose      [sš]ti
SFX T zti     simieji         zti
SFX T zti     simųjų          zti
SFX T zti     simiesiems      zti
SFX T zti     simuosius       zti
SFX T zti     simaisiais      zti
SFX T zti     simuosiuose     zti
SFX T žti     šimieji         žti
SFX T žti     šimųjų          žti
SFX T žti     šimiesiems      žti
SFX T žti     šimuosius       žti
SFX T žti     šimaisiais      žti
SFX T žti     šimuosiuose     žti
SFX T ti      simosioms       [^sšzž]ti
SFX T ti      simąsias        [^sšzž]ti
SFX T ti      simosiomis      [^sšzž]ti
SFX T ti      simosiose       [^sšzž]ti
SFX T ti      imosioms        [sš]ti
SFX T ti      imąsias         [sš]ti
SFX T ti      imosiomis       [sš]ti
SFX T ti      imosiose        [sš]ti
SFX T zti     simosioms       zti
SFX T zti     simąsias        zti
SFX T zti     simosiomis      zti
SFX T zti     simosiose       zti
SFX T žti     šimosioms       žti
SFX T žti     šimąsias        žti
SFX T žti     šimosiomis      žti
SFX T žti     šimosiose       žti

SFX U Y 6
SFX U ūti     us              ūti
SFX U yti     is              yti
SFX U s       ams             [^djt]is
SFX U is      žiams           dis
SFX U is      ams             jis
SFX U tis     čiams           tis

SFX V Y 30
SFX V s       es              is
SFX V s       ui              [^dt]is
SFX V tis     čiui            tis
SFX V is      žiui            dis
SFX V is      į               is
SFX V s       mi              is
SFX V is      yje             is
SFX V is      y               is
SFX V s       e               is
SFX V is      ys              is
SFX V s       ms              is
SFX V s       mis             is
SFX V is      yse             is
SFX V uo      ens             [^nš]uo
SFX V uo      eniui           [^nš]uo
SFX V uo      enį             [^nš]uo
SFX V uo      eniu            [^nš]uo
SFX V uo      enyje           [^nš]uo
SFX V uo      eny             [^nš]uo
SFX V uo      enie            [^nš]uo
SFX V uo      enys            [^nš]uo
SFX V uo      enų             [^nš]uo
SFX V uo      enims           [^nš]uo
SFX V uo      enis            [^nš]uo
SFX V uo      enimis          [^nš]uo
SFX V uo      enyse           [^nš]uo
SFX V ys      ims             ys
SFX V ys      is              ys
SFX V ys      imis            ys
SFX V 0       e               ys

SFX W Y 3
SFX W ti      s               [ūy]ti
SFX W s       ems             is
SFX W s       em              is
