waterfox/browser/locales/lt/extensions/spellcheck/hunspell/lt.dic
akceptuoti/RSTX
akmeninis/BNU
akmuo/V
alkėti/NTX
alternatyvinis/BNU
anatominis/BNU
angliškesnis/BNW
animuoti/NTX
antikvarinis/BNU
antrarūšis/BNU
antruonys/IV
apokrifinis/BNU
apsiveršiuoti/NTX
apydrėgnis/BNU
apymažis/BNU
apyslidis/BNU
apyšlubis/BNU
ardyti/RSTWXabdefijkpquw
armuo/V
artinis/BNU
asmuo/V
atimlioti/NTX
atitikmuo/NV
atlantinis/BNU
audmenys/KV
augalinis/BNU
auginti/RSTXabcdfhjklnoptvx
augmuo/V
aumuo/V
avangardistinis/BNU
ašmenys/KV
aštuonkampis/BNU
badauti/NRTXdfijv
badyti/RSTWXadefijklpqrwx
baigmuo/V
baltaveidis/BNU
baluoti/NTX
baniutyti/NTWX
barškaliuoti/NTX
bažnytinis/BNU
bekilmis/BNU
beoris/BNU
besiarkyti/TW
besibalotiruoti/T
besiceremonyti/TW
besidievažyti/TW
besigaivaloti/T
besikivirčyti/TW
besikuklinti/T
besimarkstyti/TW
besiskaidryti/TW
besitalkstyti/TW
besivaipyti/TW
besičiulpstyti/TW
besiūkstyti/TW
betarpis/BNU
bilateralinis/BNU
blaškyti/RSTWXdepqruw
blerbėti/NTX
brakštelėti/NTX
brazilinis/BNU
brinkyti/NTWX
bubenti/NTXk
būti/RSTUWXabcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwx
caksėti/NTX
centristinis/BNU
dabarnykštis/BNU
dailinti/RSTXacdefhklmnpqrtvw
dalmuo/V
dalyti/RSTWXabdfhjkmnprtw
dantis/KV
daryti/RSTWXabcdefhijklmnpqrtuvwx
daugiabranduolis/BNU
daugiaprasmis/BNU
daugiažiedis/BNU
daugmuo/V
debesis/KV
deguonis/IV
delsuonis/IV
demobilizuoti/NRTX
demonstracinis/BNU
dešimtkojis/BNU
didelis/BNW
dieninis/BNU
dingtelėti/NTX
distalinis/BNU
draikyti/RSTWXadefjklmpqrvx
dreižti/NTX
drobinis/BNU
drėgninti/NTX
drėgnyti/NTWX
dubuo/V
duomuo/V
dvarionis/IV
dvasuoti/NTX
dvibriaunis/BNU
dvipolis/BU
dvivėris/BNU
dėbčioti/NTX
dėmuo/V
dūmyti/RSTWXacdefgijklmnopqrstuvwx
egzogaminis/BNU
eksperimentuoti/NTXfv
elastinis/BNU
epiderminis/BNU
etnografinis/BNU
filosofinis/BNU
frakcinis/BNU
gailėti/RSTXafr
garasrovis/BNU
gaubstyti/NRTWXl
gazuoti/NTX
geležuonys/IV
geluonis/IV
genealoginis/BNU
gildyti/NTWXk
girginti/NTX
girinis/BNU
glabstyti/NRTWX
gliaudyti/NRTWXdfjv
glėbesčiuoti/RSTX
gnaibyti/NRTWXadefjkl
graibyti/RSTWXadefjkmnrv
grasyti/NTWXbcefj
gražiažiedis/BNU
grebluoti/NTX
grumdyti/NRTWXdefk
grusti/NTXfk
grąžintinis/BNU
gurbti/NTX
gvildyti/NTWX
gūžtauti/NTX
hemoraginis/BNU
homoseksualinis/BNU
ilgakaklis/BNU
imperialistinis/BNU
inspekcinis/BNU
interesuoti/RSTXk
irisinis/BNU
irstyti/NRTWXfr
išmestinis/BNU
išsigiedryti/NTWX
jaugti/NTX
jumoristinis/BNU
junkyti/NRTWXbce
juodrusvis/BNU
juosmuo/V
kaipalioti/NTX
kaitmuo/V
kaišyti/NRTWXadefjklmpr
kakofoninis/BNU
kapinėti/NTX
kapitalistinis/BNU
kardyti/NRTWXl
karuonis/IV
kasdienis/BNU
kaukšinti/NTX
kaulyti/NTWXd
keistavardis/BNU
kervinti/NTX
keturiolikinis/BNU
kiauradugnis/BNU
kinktelėti/NTX
kinkyti/NRTWXcdefjkloprw
kiškinis/BNU
klabinti/NTXf
klaipyti/NRTWXdk
klestenti/NTX
klumpsėti/NTX
klykdyti/NTWX
kniauksėti/NTX
kniedyti/NTWXjk
kokliušinis/BNU
kompromituoti/NRTXkw
koncepcinis/BNU
kontrastinis/BNU
kontūzyti/NTWX
košerinis/BNU
krakmolyti/NTWX
kramsnoti/NTXfkl
kriaukštelėti/NTX
kriaušyti/NTWX
kritinis/BNU
kryžiuoti/RSTXbehknqtw
kryžmuo/V
krūmyti/RSTWXdp
kuokelinis/BNU
kurksėti/NTX
kverkti/NTX
kęsti/NRTXadefhijmv
laidyti/RSTWXjklwx
laikinis/BNU
laižyti/RSTWXabdefhijklmnopqrtuvwx
lamžyti/NTWX
lankstyti/RSTWXabcdefhijklnptuvwx
laupyti/RSTWXabdeijmnp
leisgyvis/BNU
lenkmuo/V
lepšėti/NTXk
liemuo/V
likdyti/NTWX
likvidacinis/BNU
lituoti/RSTXabcdefhijklmnopqrtvwx
lodyti/NTWXk
lustinis/BNU
lygmuo/V
lėkštėti/NTX
magazininis/BNU
mainyti/RSTWXabcdfhijkmnoprtw
manyti/NRTWXcdefhijklmopqtuvx
margėti/NTXf
marksistinis/BNU
matmuo/V
maudyti/RSTWXadefpqrv
maumuo/V
mažiulis/BNU
meilyti/NTWXd
meistrauti/NTXl
meninis/BNU
metaduomenys/KV
metmenys/KV
migdolinis/BNU
minti/RSTXabcdefgijklnoqvwx
mintyti/NTWX
mitinis/BNU
momuo/V
moreninis/BNU
muilinti/NRTXdfjkpw
muilyti/NTWXfjk
murkdyti/NTWXclv
mėžti/NRTXacdefjlmq
mūrinis/BNU
mūryti/NRTWXadfjklrw
naršyti/NRTWXdfkrvx
nebesiblaivyti/TW
nebesidairyti/TW
nebesidalbstyti/TW
nebesigiedryti/TW
nebesimaivyti/TW
nebesinašinti/T
nebesiraivyti/TW
nebesistaipyti/TW
nebesitvankstyti/TW
nebesišaipyti/TW
neiti/NTX
nendrinis/BNU
nesibastyti/TW
nesidairyti/TW
nesigaidryti/TW
nesijuokti/T
nesikivirčyti/TW
nesimarkstyti/TW
nesiskaidryti/TW
nesitalkstyti/TW
nesitarstyti/TW
nesivaipyti/TW
nesiūkstyti/TW
nešmenys/KV
nešmuo/V
niurkti/NTX
novyti/NTWXel
nuolatinis/BNU
nusiblandyti/NTWX
nuskausminti/NTX
operacinis/BNU
pabaigtinis/BNU
paišyti/RSTWXacdefhjklopqrtv
pajuokti/NTX
palaipsninis/BNU
parabolinis/BNU
paršuoti/NTX
pasidievažyti/NTWX
pasirąžyti/NTWX
paskesnis/BNW
paskolinis/BNU
paukšnoti/NTX
pavienis/BNU
penkiabriaunis/BNU
periodinis/BNU
peštelėti/NTX
piemuo/V
pildyti/RSTWXbdfhjlprtvx
pilnaviduris/BNU
pirmuonis/DIV
pjauti/RSTXabcdefhijklmnopqrtuvw
pjūklinis/BNU
plaikstyti/RSTWXabcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwx
plaukmuo/V
plačiaragis/BNU
plikinėti/NTX
pliūryti/NTWX
plonapluoštis/BNU
plušėti/NTXbf
plūšyti/NTWXd
podiplominis/BNU
politinis/BNU
postnatalinis/BNU
prabilti/NTX
pradienis/BNU
pradmuo/V
prasiblandyti/NTWX
prieledyninis/BNU
priešmokyklinis/BNU
prisibastyti/NTWX
prisipūškinti/NTX
priskirtinis/BNU
protinis/BNU
puošmuo/V
pupsėti/NTXk
purpurinis/BNU
pusiauvėrinis/BNU
pustyti/RSTWXabcdefjklpr
putmuo/V
pušinis/BNU
pėdinti/NTXbcdegi
pūdyti/NTWXadfhk
raikyti/NTWXefjk
raišti/NTXa
ramdyti/NRTWXekq
raudonyti/NTWXcef
raumuo/V
raupinis/BNU
rašinėti/NRTXabcdefhjklmnpqrtvwx
raškyti/NRTWXdefjkqrw
rašmuo/V
reikmuo/V
retrogradinis/BNU
revizuoti/NTX
riedmenys/KV
riedmuo/V
riūkti/NTX
rodmuo/V
romyti/NTWXd
rudmargis/BNU
ruduo/V
rėmuo/V
rėplinėti/NTX
rėžyti/NTWXdk
saistyti/NTWXk
sandėliuoti/NTX
sarmatyti/RSTWXkw
saulėvengis/BNU
sekmuo/V
senybinis/BNU
siaubti/NTXe
silpnaprotis/BNU
siurbstyti/NTWX
skabinėti/NTXf
skaitmuo/V
skaityti/RSTWXabcdefhjklmnoqrtvx
skenduonis/IV
skersmuo/V
skeryčioti/RSTXfkr
skiemuo/V
skiepyti/NRTWXcfhk
skiltuvinis/BNU
sklambyti/NTWX
skliaustyti/NTWX
skubinti/NRTXdfpr
slapstyti/RSTWXabcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwx
sloguoti/NTXk
smaigyti/NTWXejk
smogtelėti/NTX
smėliasrautis/BNU
sodmuo/V
spaudmuo/V
spaudyti/RSTWXfkpv
spaudžioti/NTX
sprogmuo/V
sprūdinėti/NTX
spėmuo/V
sraumuo/V
stambiašakis/BNU
standartizuoti/RSTX
statmuo/V
stingdyti/NTWXk
stormuo/V
straptelėti/NTX
striukauodegis/BNU
stuomuo/V
suasmeninti/NTX
susidomėti/NTX
susitalkstyti/NTWX
svarmuo/V
svetimauti/NTX
sąnarinis/BNU
sėdmuo/V
sėmenys/KV
sūnyti/NRTWXco
taikmuo/V
taksenti/NTX
tardyti/NTWXd
tarmuo/V
tarpvalstybinis/BNU
tatuiruoti/NTX
tebesiblaivyti/TW
tebesigiedryti/TW
tebesiniaukstyti/TW
tebesislėgėti/T
tebesitarstyti/TW
teikmuo/V
temdyti/RSTWXajklmw
tepinėti/NTX
terpentininis/BNU
tesidalbstyti/TW
tesigriesti/T
tesikvapstyti/TW
tesispyriuoti/T
tesistaipyti/TW
tesišaipyti/TW
tešmuo/V
tilžti/NTXf
trakšėti/NTX
trandyti/NTWXk
tranzitinis/BNU
triaukštelėti/NTX
trispalvis/BNU
trypiniuoti/NTX
tuščiažiedis/BNU
tvaksėti/NTXk
tvankyti/NTWX
tąsioti/NTX
tąsyti/RSTWXadfjklmrw
tėvonis/IV
urzgauti/NTX
užtvarinis/BNU
vagis/DIV
vaidmuo/V
vaisyti/NRTWXcdjlx
valyti/RSTWXadefikmpqruvw
vanduo/V
vargonininkauti/NTX
vartyti/RSTWXabcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwx
vasaržalis/BNU
važmuo/V
veikmuo/V
veikslinti/NTX
vežmuo/V
vibždėti/NTX
vienakaušis/BNU
vienbaitis/BNU
vienveiksmis/BNU
viešmuo/V
vilnyti/NTWXek
virinti/NRTXbdefhjklnw
vispusis/BNU
volioti/RSTXadfjkprvw
vystyti/RSTWXacdefhkp
vėžinti/NRTXf
zūzenti/NTX
čiaužyti/NRTWXdefr
čiulbėti/NRTXfjklw
ėdmenys/KV
ėduonis/IV
ėsdinti/NTXdk
įprastinis/BNU
šarmoti/NTXaef
šaudmuo/V
šeiminis/BNU
šelmuo/V
šiltavandenis/BNU
šiugždinėti/NTX
šlaistyti/RSTWX
šlervoti/NTX
šmeižti/NTXaj
šnypštelėti/NTX
švaistyti/RSTWXdeipr
šviesiaplaukis/BDNU
švilpiniuoti/NTX
ūmėdžiauti/NTX
žargstyti/NRTWX
žegčioti/NTX
želmuo/V
žiemamiegis/BNU
žiodmenys/KV
žiodyti/NTWXdi
žiomuo/V
žlugdyti/NTWXk
žmoginti/NTXk
žvygtelėti/NTX
žvėris/IV
žymuo/V
